Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-130
University funds; Board of Regents; disbursements.

The university funds, other than those created by taxation, shall be held subject to the order of the Board of Regents and shall be disbursed for the purposes prescribed by law, upon presentation of warrants to the Director of Administrative Services, to be issued on certificates of the Board of Regents executed as required by law, except that no portion of such funds, not created by taxation, shall be disbursed for mileage or other traveling expenses except as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1907, c. 147, § 2, p. 461;

R.S.1913, § 7107;

C.S.1922, § 6739;

C.S.1929, § 85-125;

Laws 1933, c. 96, § 24, p. 401;

Laws 1941, c. 180, § 12, p. 708;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 85-125;

R.S.1943, § 85-130;

Laws 1983, LB 410, § 3;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 68.